Hawaii statutes.
[§304A-3201.6] Hawaii western
interstate commission for higher education. (a) There is established
within the University of Hawaii for administrative purposes only the Hawaii
western interstate commission for higher education comprised of the state commissioners
to the Western Interstate Commission for Higher Education, established under
Article III of the Western Regional Education Compact.

(b) The members of the Hawaii commission shall
be the commissioners appointed by the governor to the Western Interstate
Commission for Higher Education pursuant to section 304A-3204. The positions
of the Hawaii commissioners shall be placed within the University of Hawaii for
administrative purposes. [L 2012, c 37, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol05_Ch0261-0319
Next